Florida, session 2026, SB1450.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âAll powers, duties, functions, rules, records, 31 personnel, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations, 32 allocations, and other public funds relating to the Division of 33 the Florida Highway Patrol and the Office of Commercial Vehicle 34 Enforcement are transferred by a type one transfer, as described 35 in s. 20.06(1), Florida Statutes, from the Department of Highway 36 Safety and Motor Vehicles to the Department of Law Enforcement. 37 Section 2.âSection 20.24, Florida Statutes, is amended to 38 read: 39 20.24âDepartment of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles. 40 There is created a Department of Highway Safety and Motor 41 Vehicles. 42 (1)âThe head of the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 43 Vehicles is the Governor and Cabinet. The executive director of 44 the department shall be appointed by the Governor subject to a 45 majority vote of the Governor and Cabinet, with the Governor on 46 the prevailing side. The appointment is subject to confirmation 47 by the Senate. The executive director shall serve at the 48 pleasure of the Governor and Cabinet. 49 (2)âThe Division of Motorist Services is established within 50 following divisions, and bureaus within the divisions, of the 51 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles are established: 52 (a)âDivision of the Florida Highway Patrol. 53 (b)âDivision of Motorist Services. 54 (3)âThe Office of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement is 55 established within the Division of the Florida Highway Patrol. 56 Section 3.âSubsection (2) of section 23.1231, Florida 57 Statutes, is amended to read: 58 23.1231âFlorida Mutual Aid Plan; powers and duties.â 59 (2)âThe executive director of the Department of Law 60 Enforcement acting under the Governor as the stateâs chief law 61 enforcement officer is the director of the Florida Mutual Aid 62 Plan. The director of the Florida Mutual Aid Plan shall: 63 (a)âCoordinate, integrate, and implement law enforcement 64 planning and activities for the use of mutual aid and state 65 resources; 66 (b)âCoordinate the organization and direction of the law 67 enforcement services of the Florida Mutual Aid Plan; 68 (c)âCoordinate and implement the gathering and collection 69 of information and intelligence relating to law enforcement 70 mutual aid or assistance from state agencies to support local 71 law enforcement agencies in any local disaster or emergency, and 72 provide information to state and local law enforcement agencies; 73 (d)âDuring a state of emergency declared by the Governor 74 under chapter 252, command, control, and coordinate all state 75 law enforcement personnel and equipment to support local law 76 enforcement agencies; 77 (e)âAct as the liaison with the Division of the Florida 78 Highway Patrol of the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 79 Vehicles in order to coordinate and integrate plans for traffic 80 control and the participation of the department in the law 81 enforcement operation; 82 (f)âServe as liaison and guide the flow of requests from 83 local law enforcement for requesting law enforcement services 84 from the Florida National Guard; 85 (g)âServe as liaison to the Governor, federal and state 86 departments and agencies, and local law enforcement officials in 87 order to achieve close coordination and cooperation in planning 88 and operations in trouble areas; 89 (h)âGuide the flow of law enforcement information from 90 federal and state organizations to local law enforcement 91 officials; 92 (i)âServe as liaison to the Attorney General in order to 93 keep him or her informed of changes in law enforcement plans and 94 regulations, mutual aid agreements, and current developments in 95 all situations from a legal standpoint; and 96 (j)âDo other things necessary for the implementation of 97 this part. 98 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 99 282.709, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 100 282.709âState agency law enforcement radio system and 101 interoperability network.â 102 (2)âThe Joint Task Force on State Agency Law Enforcement 103 Communications is created adjunct to the department to advise 104 the department of member-agency needs relating to the planning, 105 designing, and establishment of the statewide communication 106 system. 107 (a)âThe Joint Task Force on State Agency Law Enforcement 108 Communications shall consist of the following members: 109 1.âA representative of the Division of Alcoholic Beverages 110 and Tobacco of the Department of Business and Professional 111 Regulation who shall be appointed by the secretary of the 112 department. 113 2.âA representative of the Division of Florida Highway 114 Patrol of the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 115 who shall be appointed by the executive director of the 116 department. 117 3.âA representative of the Department of Law Enforcement 118 who shall be appointed by the executive director of the 119 department. 120 4.âA representative of the Fish and Wildlife Conservation 121 Commission who shall be appointed by the executive director of 122 the commission. 123 5.âA representative of the Division of Law Enforcement of 124 the Department of Environmental Protection who shall be 125 appointed by the secretary of the department. 126 6.âA representative of the Department of Corrections who 127 shall be appointed by the secretary of the department. 128 7.âA representative of the Department of Financial Services 129 who shall be appointed by the Chief Financial Officer. 130 8.âA representative of the Department of Agriculture and 131 Consumer Services who shall be appointed by the Commissioner of 132 Agriculture. 133 9.âA representative of the Florida Sheriffs Association who 134 shall be appointed by the president of the Florida Sheriffs 135 Association. 136 Section 5.âSection 321.011, Florida Statutes, is created to 137 read: 138 321.011âDefinition.âAs used in this chapter, the term 139 âdepartmentâ means the Department of Law Enforcement. 140 Section 6.âSubsection (3) is added to section 20.201, 141 Florida Statutes, to read: 142 20.201âDepartment of Law Enforcement.â 143 (3)âThe following divisions, and bureaus within the 144 divisions, of the Department of Law Enforcement are established: 145 (a)âThe Division of the Florida Highway Patrol. 146 (b)âThe Office of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement within the 147 Division of the Florida Highway Patrol. 148 Section 7.âParagraph (m) of subsection (2) of section 149 110.205, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 150 110.205âCareer service; exemptions.â 151 (2)âEXEMPT POSITIONS.âThe exempt positions that are not 152 covered by this part include the following: 153 (m)âAll assistant division director, deputy division 154 director, and bureau chief positions in any department, and 155 those positions determined by the department to have managerial 156 responsibilities comparable to such positions, which include, 157 but are not limited to: 158 1.âPositions in the Department of Health and the Department 159 of Children and Families which are assigned primary duties of 160 serving as the superintendent or assistant superintendent of an 161 institution. 162 2.âPositions in the Department of Corrections which are 163 assigned primary duties of serving as the warden, assistant 164 warden, colonel, or major of an institution or that are assigned 165 primary duties of serving as the circuit administrator or deputy 166 circuit administrator. 167 3.âPositions in the Department of Transportation which are 168 assigned primary duties of serving as regional toll managers and 169 managers of offices, as specified in s. 20.23(4)(b) and (5)(c). 170 4.âPositions in the Department of Environmental Protection 171 which are assigned the duty of an Environmental Administrator or 172 program administrator. 173 5.âPositions in the Department of Health which are assigned 174 the duties of Environmental Administrator, Assistant County 175 Health Department Director, and County Health Department 176 Financial Administrator. 177 6.âPositions in the Department of Law Enforcement Highway 178 Safety and Motor Vehicles which are assigned primary duties of 179 serving as captains in the Florida Highway Patrol. 180 7.âPositions in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 181 Services which are assigned primary duties of serving as 182 captains or majors in the Office of Agricultural Law 183 Enforcement. 184 185 Unless otherwise fixed by law, the department shall set the 186 salary and benefits of the positions listed in this paragraph in 187 accordance with the rules established for the Selected Exempt 188 Service. 189 Section 8.âSubsections (6) and (8) of section 120.80, 190 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 191 120.80âExceptions and special requirements; agencies.â 192 (6)âDEPARTMENT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT.â 193 (a)âLaw enforcement policies and procedures of the 194 Department of Law Enforcement which relate to the following are 195 not rules as defined by this chapter: 196 1.(a)âThe collection, management, and dissemination of 197 active criminal intelligence information and active criminal 198 investigative information; management of criminal 199 investigations; and management of undercover investigations and 200 the selection, assignment, and fictitious identity of undercover 201 personnel. 202 2.(b)âThe recruitment, management, identity, and 203 remuneration of confidential informants or sources. 204 3.(c)âSurveillance techniques, the selection of 205 surveillance personnel, and electronic surveillance, including 206 court-ordered and consensual interceptions of communication 207 conducted pursuant to chapter 934. 208 4.(d)âThe safety and release of hostages. 209 5.(e)âThe provision of security and protection to public 210 figures. 211 6.(f)âThe protection of witnesses. 212 (b)âNotwithstanding s. 120.57(1)(a), hearings held by the 213 Division of the Florida Highway Patrol to deny, suspend, or 214 remove a wrecker operator from participating in the wrecker 215 rotation system established by s. 321.051 need not be conducted 216 by an administrative law judge assigned by the division. These 217 hearings shall be held by a hearing officer appointed by the 218 director of the Division of the Florida Highway Patrol. 219 (8)âDEPARTMENT OF HIGHWAY SAFETY AND MOTOR VEHICLES.â 220 (a)âDriver licenses.â 221 (a)1.âNotwithstanding s. 120.57(1)(a), hearings regarding 222 driver licensing pursuant to chapter 322 need not be conducted 223 by an administrative law judge assigned by the division. 224 (b)2.âNotwithstanding s. 120.60(5), cancellation, 225 suspension, or revocation of a driver license shall be by 226 personal delivery to the licensee or by first-class mail as 227 provided in s. 322.251. 228 (b)âWrecker operators.âNotwithstanding s. 120.57(1)(a), 229 hearings held by the Division of the Florida Highway Patrol of 230 the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles to deny, 231 suspend, or remove a wrecker operator from participating in the 232 wrecker rotation system established by s. 321.051 need not be 233 conducted by an administrative law judge assigned by the 234 division. These hearings shall be held by a hearing officer 235 appointed by the director of the Division of the Florida Highway 236 Patrol. 237 Section 9.âSubsection (20) of section 316.003, Florida 238 Statutes, is amended to read: 239 316.003âDefinitions.âThe following words and phrases, when 240 used in this chapter, shall have the meanings respectively 241 ascribed to them in this section, except where the context 242 otherwise requires: 243 (20)âDIRECTOR.âThe director of the Division of the Florida 244 Highway Patrol of the Department of Law Enforcement Highway 245 Safety and Motor Vehicles. 246 Section 10.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 247 316.640, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 248 316.640âEnforcement.âThe enforcement of the traffic laws of 249 this state is vested as follows: 250 (1)âSTATE.â 251 (a)1.a.âThe Division of the Florida Highway Patrol of the 252 Department of Law Enforcement Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles; 253 the Division of Law Enforcement of the Fish and Wildlife 254 Conservation Commission; the Division of Law Enforcement of the 255 Department of Environmental Protection; and the agents, 256 inspectors, and officers of the Department of Law Enforcement 257 each have authority to enforce all of the traffic laws of this 258 state on all the streets and highways thereof and elsewhere 259 throughout the state wherever the public has a right to travel 260 by motor vehicle. 261 b.âUniversity police officers may enforce all of the 262 traffic laws of this state when violations occur on or within 263 1,000 feet of any property or facilities that are under the 264 guidance, supervision, regulation, or control of a state 265 university, a direct-support organization of such state 266 university, or any other organization controlled by the state 267 university or a direct-support organization of the state 268 university, or when such violations occur within a specified 269 jurisdictional area as agreed upon in a mutual aid agreement 270 entered into with a law enforcement agency pursuant to s. 271 23.1225(1). Traffic laws may also be enforced off-campus when 272 hot pursuit originates on or within 1,000 feet of any such 273 property or facilities, or as agreed upon in accordance with the 274 mutual aid agreement. 275 c.âFlorida College System institution police officers may 276 enforce all the traffic laws of this state only when such 277 violations occur on or within 1,000 feet of any property or 278 facilities that are under the guidance, supervision, regulation, 279 or control of the Florida College System institution, or when 280 such violations occur within a specified jurisdictional area as 281 agreed upon in a mutual aid agreement entered into with a law 282 enforcement agency pursuant to s. 23.1225. Traffic laws may also 283 be enforced off-campus when hot pursuit originates on or within 284 1,000 feet of any such property or facilities, or as agreed upon 285 in accordance with the mutual aid agreement. 286 d.âPolice officers employed by an airport authority may 287 enforce all of the traffic laws of this state only when such 288 violations occur on any property or facilities that are owned or 289 operated by an airport authority. 290 (I)âAn airport authority may employ as a parking 291 enforcement specialist any individual who successfully completes 292 a training program established and approved by the Criminal 293 Justice Standards and Training Commission for parking 294 enforcement specialists but who does not otherwise meet the 295 uniform minimum standards established by the commission for law 296 enforcement officers or auxiliary or part-time officers under s. 297 943.12. This sub-sub-subparagraph may not be construed to permit 298 the carrying of firearms or other weapons, nor shall such 299 parking enforcement specialist have arrest authority. 300 (II)âA parking enforcement specialist employed by an 301 airport authority may enforce all state, county, and municipal 302 laws and ordinances governing parking only when such violations 303 are on property or facilities owned or operated by the airport 304 authority employing the specialist, by appropriate state, 305 county, or municipal traffic citation. 306 e.âThe Office of Agricultural Law Enforcement of the 307 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may enforce 308 traffic laws of this state. 309 f.âSchool safety officers may enforce all of the traffic 310 laws of this state when such violations occur on or about any 311 property or facilities that are under the guidance, supervision, 312 regulation, or control of the district school board. 313 2.âAny disciplinary action taken or performance evaluation 314 conducted by an agency of the state as described in subparagraph 315 1. of a law enforcement officerâs traffic enforcement activity 316 must be in accordance with written work-performance standards. 317 Such standards must be approved by the agency and any collective 318 bargaining unit representing such law enforcement officer. A 319 violation of this subparagraph is not subject to the penalties 320 provided in chapter 318. 321 3.âThe Division of the Florida Highway Patrol may employ as 322 a traffic accident investigation officer any individual who 323 successfully completes instruction in traffic accident 324 investigation and court presentation through the Selective 325 Traffic Enforcement Program as approved by the Criminal Justice 326 Standards and Training Commission and funded through the 327 National Highway Traffic Safety Administration or a similar 328 program approved by the commission, but who does not necessarily 329 meet the uniform minimum standards established by the commission 330 for law enforcement officers or auxiliary law enforcement 331 officers under chapter 943. Any such traffic accident 332 investigation officer who makes an investigation at the scene of 333 a traffic accident may issue traffic citations, based upon 334 personal investigation, when he or she has reasonable and 335 probable grounds to believe that a person who was involved in 336 the accident committed an offense under this chapter, chapter 337 319, chapter 320, or chapter 322 in connection with the 338 accident. This subparagraph does not permit the officer to carry 339 firearms or other weapons, and such an officer does not have 340 authority to make arrests. 341 Section 11.âSection 321.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to 342 read: 343 321.02âPowers and duties of department, highway patrol.âThe 344 director of the Division of the Florida Highway Patrol of the 345 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles shall also be 346 the commander of the Florida Highway Patrol. The said department 347 shall set up and adopt promulgate rules and regulations by which 348 the personnel of the Florida Highway Patrol officers shall be 349 examined, employed, trained, located, suspended, reduced in 350 rank, discharged, recruited, paid, and pensioned, subject to 351 civil service provisions hereafter set out. The department may 352 enter into contracts or agreements, with or without competitive 353 bidding or procurement, to make available, on a fair, 354 reasonable, nonexclusive, and nondiscriminatory basis, property 355 and other structures under division control for the placement of 356 new facilities by any wireless provider of mobile service as 357 defined in 47 U.S.C. s. 153(27) or s. 332(d), and any 358 telecommunications company as defined in s. 364.02 when it is 359 determined to be practical and feasible to make such property or 360 other structures available. The department may, without adopting 361 a rule, charge a just, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory fee for 362 placement of the facilities, payable annually, based on the fair 363 market value of space used by comparable communications 364 facilities in the state. The department and a wireless provider 365 or telecommunications company may negotiate the reduction or 366 elimination of a fee in consideration of services provided to 367 the division by the wireless provider or the telecommunications 368 company. All such fees collected by the department shall be 369 deposited directly into the State Agency Law Enforcement Radio 370 System Trust Fund, and may be used to construct, maintain, or 371 support the system. The department is further specifically 372 authorized to purchase, sell, trade, rent, lease, and maintain 373 all necessary equipment, uniforms, motor vehicles, communication 374 systems, housing facilities, and office space, and perform any 375 other acts necessary for the proper administration and 376 enforcement of this chapter. However, all supplies and equipment 377 consisting of single items or in lots shall be purchased under 378 the requirements of s. 287.057. Purchases shall be made by 379 accepting the bid of the lowest responsive bidder, the right 380 being reserved to reject all bids. The department shall 381 prescribe a distinctive uniform and distinctive emblem to be 382 worn by all officers of the Florida Highway Patrol. It shall be 383 unlawful for any other person or persons to wear a similar 384 uniform or emblem, or any part or parts thereof. The department 385 shall also prescribe distinctive colors for use on motor 386 vehicles and motorcycles operated by the Florida Highway Patrol. 387 The prescribed colors shall be referred to as âFlorida Highway 388 Patrol black and tan.â 389 Section 12.âSection 321.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to 390 read: 391 321.03âImitations prohibited; penalty.âUnless specifically 392 authorized by the Florida Highway Patrol, a person in this the 393 state may shall not color or cause to be colored any motor 394 vehicle or motorcycle the same or similar color as the color or 395 colors so prescribed for the Florida Highway Patrol. A person 396 who violates this section or s. 321.02 with respect to uniforms, 397 emblems, motor vehicles, and motorcycles commits a misdemeanor 398 of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 399 775.083. The department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 400 shall employ such clerical help and mechanics as may be 401 necessary for the economical and efficient operation of the such 402 department. 403 Section 13.âSection 321.04, Florida Statutes, is amended to 404 read: 405 321.04âPersonnel of the highway patrol; rank 406 classifications; probationary status of new patrol officers; 407 subsistence; special assignments.â 408 (1)âThe department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 409 shall employ patrol officers, as authorized by the Legislature 410 in appropriating funds for their salaries exclusive of those 411 members of the patrol who are assigned to and paid by special 412 departments; and shall establish the necessary supervisory ranks 413 within the Florida Highway Patrol to efficiently supervise and 414 carry out the designated functions of the patrol and the 415 department in accordance with the regulations established by the 416 Department of Management Services. 417 (2)âEach person who is employed as a patrol officer shall 418 be carried on a probationary status for the period of 1 year 419 after from date of employment, during which period he or she may 420 be dismissed without recourse. Patrol officers when sent on 421 special detail or missions out of their regular assigned 422 territories or headquarters shall be reimbursed for travel 423 expenses as provided in s. 112.061. 424 (3)(a)âThe department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 425 shall assign one patrol officer to the office of the Governor. 426 Such; said patrol officer so assigned shall be selected by the 427 Governor and shall have rank and pay not less than that of a 428 lieutenant of the Florida Highway Patrol;, and said patrol 429 officer so assigned shall be paid by the said department from 430 the appropriation made to the said department; and said patrol 431 officer shall have and receive all other benefits provided for 432 in this chapter or any other statute now in existence or 433 hereinafter enacted. 434 (b)âFor the 2024-2025 fiscal year only, upon the request of 435 the Governor, the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 436 Vehicles shall assign one or more patrol officers to the office 437 of the Lieutenant Governor for security services. This paragraph 438 expires July 1, 2025. 439 (4)âUpon request of the Attorney General, the department of 440 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles shall assign one or more 441 patrol officers to the Office of the Attorney General for 442 security services. 443 (5)âFor the 2024-2025 fiscal year only, the assignment of a 444 patrol officer by the department shall include a Cabinet member 445 specified in s. 4, Art. IV of the State Constitution if deemed 446 appropriate by the department or in response to a threat and 447 upon written request of such Cabinet member. This subsection 448 expires July 1, 2025. 449 Section 14.âSection 321.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to 450 read: 451 321.05âDuties, functions, and powers of patrol officers. 452 The members of the Florida Highway Patrol are hereby declared to 453 be conservators of the peace and law enforcement officers of 454 this the state, with the common-law right to arrest a person 455 who, in the presence of the arresting officer, commits a felony 456 or commits an affray or breach of the peace constituting a 457 misdemeanor, with full power to bear arms; and they shall 458 apprehend, without warrant, any person in the unlawful 459 commission of any of the acts over which the members of the 460 Florida Highway Patrol are given jurisdiction as hereinafter set 461 out and deliver him or her to the sheriff of the county that 462 further proceedings may be had against him or her according to 463 law. In the performance of any of the powers, duties, and 464 functions authorized by law, members of the Florida Highway 465 Patrol have the same protections and immunities afforded other 466 peace officers, which shall be recognized by all courts having 467 jurisdiction over offenses against the laws of this state, and 468 have authority to apply for, serve, and execute search warrants, 469 arrest warrants, capias, and other process of the court. The 470 patrol officers under the direction and supervision of the 471 department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles shall perform 472 and exercise throughout the state the following duties, 473 functions, and powers: 474 (1)âTo patrol the state highways and regulate, control, and 475 direct the movement of traffic thereon; to maintain the public 476 peace by preventing violence on highways; to apprehend fugitives 477 from justice; to enforce all laws regulating and governing 478 traffic, travel, and public safety upon the public highways and 479 providing for the protection of the public highways and public 480 property thereon, including the security and safety of this 481 stateâs transportation infrastructure; to make arrests without 482 warrant for the violation of any state law committed in their 483 presence in accordance with state law; providing that no search 484 may be made unless it is incident to a lawful arrest, to 485 regulate and direct traffic concentrations and congestions; to 486 enforce laws governing the operation, licensing, and taxing and 487 limiting the size, weight, width, length, and speed of vehicles 488 and licensing and controlling the operations of drivers and 489 operators of vehicles, including the safety, size, and weight of 490 commercial motor vehicles; to collect all state fees and 491 revenues levied as an incident to the use or right to use the 492 highways for any purpose, including the taxing and registration 493 of commercial motor vehicles; to require the drivers of vehicles 494 to stop and exhibit their driver licenses, registration cards, 495 or documents required by law to be carried by such vehicles; to 496 investigate traffic accidents, secure testimony of witnesses and 497 of persons involved, and make report thereof with copy, if 498 requested in writing, to any person in interest or his or her 499 attorney; to investigate reported thefts of vehicles; and to 500 seize contraband or stolen property on or being transported on 501 the highways. Each patrol officer of the Florida Highway Patrol 502 is subject to and has the same arrest and other authority 503 provided for law enforcement officers generally in chapter 901 504 and has statewide jurisdiction. Each officer also has arrest 505 authority as provided for state law enforcement officers in s. 506 901.15. This section does not conflict with, but is supplemental 507 to, chapter 933. 508 (2)âTo assist other constituted law enforcement officers of 509 the state to quell mobs and riots, guard prisoners, and police 510 disaster areas. 511 (3)(a)âTo make arrests while in fresh pursuit of a person 512 believed to have violated the traffic and other laws. 513 (b)âTo make arrest of a person wanted for a felony or 514 against whom a warrant has been issued on any charge in 515 violation of federal, state, or county laws or municipal 516 ordinances. 517 (4)(a)âAll fines and costs and the proceeds of the 518 forfeiture of bail bonds and recognizances resulting from the 519 enforcement of this chapter by patrol officers shall be paid 520 into the fine and forfeiture fund established pursuant to s. 521 142.01 of the county where the offense is committed. In all 522 cases of arrest by patrol officers, the person arrested shall be 523 delivered forthwith by the officer to the sheriff of the county, 524 or he or she shall obtain from the person arrested a 525 recognizance or, if deemed necessary, a cash bond or other 526 sufficient security conditioned for his or her appearance before 527 the proper tribunal of the county to answer the charge for which 528 he or she has been arrested; and all fees accruing shall be 529 taxed against the party arrested, which fees are hereby declared 530 to be part of the compensation of the sheriffs authorized to be 531 fixed by the Legislature under s. 5(c), Art. II of the State 532 Constitution, to be paid such sheriffs in the same manner as 533 fees are paid for like services in other criminal cases. All 534 patrol officers are hereby directed to deliver all bonds 535 accepted and approved by them to the sheriff of the county in 536 which the offense is alleged to have been committed. However, a 537 sheriff shall not be paid any arrest fee for the arrest of a 538 person for violation of any section of chapter 316 when the 539 arresting officer was transported in a Florida Highway Patrol 540 car to the vicinity where the arrest was made; and a sheriff 541 shall not be paid any fee for mileage for himself or herself or 542 a prisoner for miles traveled in a Florida Highway Patrol car. A 543 patrol officer is not entitled to any fee or mileage cost except 544 when responding to a subpoena in a civil cause or except when 545 the patrol officer is appearing as an official witness to 546 testify at any hearing or law action in any court of this state 547 as a direct result of his or her employment as a patrol officer 548 during time not compensated as a part of his or her normal 549 duties. Nothing herein shall be construed as limiting the power 550 to locate and to take from any person under arrest or about to 551 be arrested deadly weapons. This section is not a limitation 552 upon existing powers and duties of sheriffs or police officers. 553 (b)âAny person so arrested and released on his or her own 554 recognizance by an officer and who fails to appear or respond to 555 a notice to appear, in addition to the traffic violation charge, 556 commits a noncriminal traffic infraction subject to the penalty 557 provided in s. 318.18(2). 558 (5)âThe department may employ or assign some fit and 559 suitable person with experience in the field of public relations 560 who shall promote, coordinate, and publicize the traffic safety 561 activities in the state and assign such person to the office of 562 the Governor at a salary to be fixed by the department. The 563 person so assigned or employed shall be a member of the uniform 564 division of the Florida Highway Patrol, and he or she shall have 565 the pay and rank of lieutenant while on such assignment. 566 (6)âThe Division of the Florida Highway Patrol may is 567 authorized to adopt rules as which may be necessary to implement 568 the provisions of chapter 316. 569 Section 15.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 570 321.051, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 571 321.051âFlorida Highway Patrol wrecker operator system; 572 penalties for operation outside of system.â 573 (2)(a)âThe Division of the Florida Highway Patrol may of 574 the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles is 575 authorized to establish within areas designated by the patrol a 576 wrecker operator system using qualified, reputable wrecker 577 operators for removal and storage of wrecked or disabled 578 vehicles from a crash scene or for removal and storage of 579 abandoned vehicles, in the event the owner or operator is 580 incapacitated or unavailable or leaves the procurement of 581 wrecker service to the officer at the scene. All reputable 582 wrecker operators are eligible for use in the system provided 583 their equipment and drivers meet recognized safety 584 qualifications and mechanical standards set by rules of the 585 Division of the Florida Highway Patrol for the size of vehicle 586 it is designed to handle. The division may not exclude a wrecker 587 operator from the wrecker operator system or fail to designate a 588 wrecker operator as an authorized wrecker operator based solely 589 on a prior felony conviction unless such conviction is for a 590 forcible felony as defined in s. 776.08 or a felony listed in s. 591 812.014(2)(c)6. or s. 812.16(2). The division may is authorized 592 to limit the number of wrecker operators participating in the 593 wrecker operator system, which authority shall not affect 594 wrecker operators currently participating in the system 595 established by this section. The division must establish maximum 596 rates for the towing and storage of vehicles removed at the 597 divisionâs request, where such rates have not been set by a 598 county or municipality pursuant to s. 125.0103 or s. 166.043. 599 Such rates may shall not be considered rules for the purpose of 600 chapter 120; however, the department shall establish by rule a 601 procedure for setting such rates. 602 Section 16.âSection 321.245, Florida Statutes, is amended 603 to read: 604 321.245âDisposition of certain funds in the Highway Safety 605 Operating Trust Fund.âThe director of the Florida Highway 606 Patrol, after receiving recommendations from the commander of 607 the auxiliary, may is authorized to purchase uniforms and 608 equipment for auxiliary law enforcement officers as defined in 609 s. 321.24 from funds in the Department of Law Enforcement 610 Operating Trust Fund described in s. 324.0221(3). The amounts 611 expended under this section shall not exceed $50,000 in any one 612 fiscal year. 613 Section 17.âSection 321.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to 614 read: 615 321.25âTraining provided at patrol schools.âThe Department 616 of Law Enforcement may Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles is 617 authorized to provide for the training of law enforcement 618 officials and individuals in matters relating to the duties, 619 functions, and powers of the Florida Highway Patrol in the 620 schools established by the Department of Highway Safety and 621 Motor Vehicles, or, on or after July 1, 2026, established by the 622 Department of Law Enforcement, for the training of highway 623 patrol candidates and officers. The Department of Law 624 Enforcement may Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles is authorized 625 to charge a fee for providing the training authorized by this 626 section. The fee shall be charged to persons attending the 627 training. The fee shall be based on the departmentâs Department 628 of Highway Safety and Motor Vehiclesâ costs for providing the 629 training, and such costs may include, but are not limited to, 630 tuition, lodging, and meals. Revenues from the fees shall be 631 used to offset the departmentâs Department of Highway Safety and 632 Motor Vehiclesâ costs for providing the training. The cost of 633 training local enforcement officers shall be paid for by their 634 respective offices, counties or municipalities, as the case may 635 be. Such cost shall be deemed a proper county or municipal 636 expense or a proper expenditure of the office of sheriff. 637 Section 18.âSubsection (2) of section 338.239, Florida 638 Statutes, is amended to read: 639 338.239âTraffic control on the turnpike system.â 640 (2)âMembers of the Florida Highway Patrol are vested with 641 the power, and charged with the duty, to enforce the rules of 642 the department. Approved expenditures incurred by the Florida 643 Highway Patrol in carrying out its powers and duties under ss. 644 338.22-338.241 may be treated as a part of the cost of the 645 operation of the turnpike system, and the Department of Law 646 Enforcement Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles shall be 647 reimbursed by the turnpike enterprise for such expenses incurred 648 on the turnpike system. Florida Highway Patrol Troop K shall be 649 headquartered with the turnpike enterprise and shall be the 650 official and preferred law enforcement troop for the turnpike 651 system. The Department of Law Enforcement Highway Safety and 652 Motor Vehicles may, upon request of the executive director of 653 the turnpike enterprise and approval of the Legislature, 654 increase the number of authorized positions for Troop K, or the 655 executive director of the turnpike enterprise may contract with 656 the Department of Law Enforcement Highway Safety and Motor 657 Vehicles for additional troops to patrol the turnpike system. 658 Section 19.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 659 713.78, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 660 713.78âLiens for recovering, towing, or storing vehicles 661 and vessels.â 662 (2)(a)âA towing-storage operator may charge the owner or 663 operator of a vehicle or vessel only the following fees for, or 664 incidental to, the recovery, removal, or storage of the vehicle 665 or vessel: 666 1.âAny reasonable fee for service specifically authorized 667 under s. 125.0103 or s. 166.043 by ordinance, resolution, 668 regulation, or rule of the county or municipality in which the 669 service is performed. 670 2.âAny reasonable fee for service specifically authorized 671 by the Division of the Florida Highway Patrol of the Department 672 of Law Enforcement Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles under s. 673 321.051(2). 674 3.âAny reasonable fee for service as agreed upon in writing 675 between a towing-storage operator and the owner of a vehicle or 676 vessel. 677 4.âAny lien release administrative fee as set forth in 678 paragraph (15)(a). 679 5.âAny reasonable administrative fee or charge imposed by a 680 county or municipality pursuant to s. 125.01047, s. 166.04465, 681 or s. 323.002 upon the registered owner or other legally 682 authorized person in control of a vehicle or vessel. 683 Section 20.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.